Maryland, session 2026, HB1473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 3. MARYLAND’S FUTURE BOARD.
2.5–301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BOARD” MEANS THE MARYLAND’S FUTURE BOARD.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND.
(D) “PROJECT” INCLUDES:
(1) AN ALLOCATION OF FUNDS IN THE OPERATING BUDGET OF THE
STATE;
(2) AN ALLOCATION OF FUNDS IN THE CAPITAL BUDGET OF THE
STATE; AND
(3) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF ANY POLICY THAT WILL ADVANCE THE
STATE’S SOCIOECONOMIC WELLBEING AND RESILIENCY.
(E) “VISIONARY PLAN” MEANS A PLAN THAT ENVISIONS A STATE THAT IS
EQUITABLE, PROSPEROUS, LIVABLE, AND PROVIDES OPPORTUNITIES FOR ALL
RESIDENTS TO THRIVE, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1473
(1) A FORWARD–THINKING STRATEGY THAT WOULD INCORPORATE
CORE VALUES AND PRINCIPLES AS ENVISIONED BY THE BOARD;
(2) A STRATEGY THAT COVERS BROADLY ISSUES THAT THE STATE
FACES;
(3) A STRATEGY THAT IS NOT CONSTRAINED BY EXISTING
TECHNOLOGY, INFRASTRUCTURE, OR FISCAL CONDITIONS OF THE STATE; AND
(4) STRATEGIES THAT IMAGINE FUTURE TRENDS IN THE FOLLOWING
AREAS:
(I) ROBOTICS AND AUTOMATION;
(II) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE;
(III) ADVANCED MANUFACTURING;
(IV) DATA AGGREGATIONS; AND
(V) OTHER INDUSTRY DISRUPTIVE TECHNOLOGIES.
2.5–302.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND’S FUTURE BOARD IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) THREE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) THE COMPTROLLER, OR THE COMPTROLLER’S DESIGNEE;
(III) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE; AND
(III) (IV) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL CONSIST OF INDIVIDUALS WHO,
COLLECTIVELY, ARE VISIONARY THINKERS FOR AN ECONOMIC FUTURE OF THE
STATE THAT ATTRACTS INDIVIDUALS WHO WANT TO LIVE, WORK, AND LEARN IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1473 5
(I) ENTREPRENEURS;
(II) MEMBERS OF ACADEMIA;
(III) ETHICISTS;
(IV) ARTISTS;
(V) PHILANTHROPISTS; AND
(VI) LEADERS IN:
1. LABOR ORGANIZATIONS;
2. BUSINESS;
3. HIGHER EDUCATION; AND
4. NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS.
(3) (I) WHEN APPOINTING MEMBERS CONSIDERATION SHALL BE
GIVEN TO GEOGRAPHIC REPRESENTATION.
(II) THE MEMBERS APPOINTED TO THE BOARD SHALL REFLECT
THE DEMOGRAPHICS OF THE STATE.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER APPOINTED TO THE BOARD IS 4 YEARS
AND BEGINS ON JULY 1.
(2) (I) A VACANCY SHALL BE FILLED IMMEDIATELY FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE UNEXPIRED PORTION OF A TERM.
(II) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR HAS BEEN APPOINTED.
(3) A MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR, THE PRESIDENT OF
THE SENATE, OR THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE
APPOINTING OFFICER.
(D) (1) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:

HOUSE BILL 1473
(I) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
BOARD; BUT
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(2) (I) THE BOARD IS SUBJECT TO THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT
AND THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT.
(II) THE BOARD MEMBERS ARE SUBJECT TO THE MARYLAND
PUBLIC ETHICS LAW.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST FOUR TIMES PER YEAR.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBTITLE BY:
(1) DEVELOPING AND REVISING A VISIONARY PLAN UNDER § 2.5–303
OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) IN ALIGNMENT WITH THE VISIONARY PLAN, RECOMMENDING
PROJECTS THAT MOVE THE STATE FORWARD AND CONTRIBUTE TO ENSURING THE
ECONOMIC STRENGTH OF THE STATE INTO THE FUTURE; AND
(3) CONSULTING WITH ENTITIES AND STATE AGENCIES, AS NEEDED.
2.5–303.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP A
VISIONARY PLAN FOR THE FUTURE OF THE STATE THAT CARRIES OUT THE PURPOSE
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL EVALUATE THE VISIONARY PLAN AT LEAST
ANNUALLY AND REVISE THE PLAN ACCORDINGLY.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT THE VISIONARY PLAN TO THE GOVERNOR
AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE
VISIONARY PLAN OR A REVISION TO THE VISIONARY PLAN.
(D) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, AND EACH AUGUST 1 THEREAFTER,
THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT RECOMMENDATIONS FOR PROJECTS TO THE GOVERNOR

HOUSE BILL 1473 7
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
2.5–304.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FUND THE PROJECTS RECOMMENDED
BY THE BOARD MADE UNDER § 2.5–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR PROJECTS RECOMMENDED BY THE
BOARD UNDER § 2.5–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR THE SAME PURPOSE.

HOUSE BILL 1473
2.5–305.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND.
Chapter 717 of the Acts of 2024, as amended by Chapters 237, 409, and 410 of the
Acts of 2025
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, and unless inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other
federal requirement, or with the terms of a gift or settlement agreement, for fiscal years
2024 through 2028, net interest on all State money allocated by the State Treasurer under
§ 6–226 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to special funds or accounts, and
otherwise entitled to receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall
accrue to the General Fund of the State, with the exception of the following funds:
(87) the Academic Excellence Fund; [and]
(88) the Abandoned and Neglected Cemeteries Fund; AND
(89) THE MARYLAND’S FUTURE FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

HOUSE BILL 1473 9
(a) (1) The Comptroller shall study the economic growth trends in Maryland,
including the trends for industries in which Maryland has a competitive advantage or any
other industries that have an outsized presence in Maryland.
(2) The study shall identify the growth that is needed in the competitive
industries to ensure the financial and socioeconomic well–being of the residents of Maryland.
(3) The study may examine the social and economic factors that are expected
to significantly change over the next 10 years or more, including:
(i) state migration trends;
(ii) job replacement due to the rise in artificial intelligence; and
(iii) the need for universal basic income or advanced technology
workforce training.
(4) The Comptroller may contract with an independent consultant to assist
the Comptroller in the preparation of the study required under this paragraph.
(b) On or before December 1, 2026, the Comptroller shall report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the result of the
study under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30,
2031, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.